California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79071.

The Watershed Protection Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of four hundred sixty-eight million dollars ($468,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Watershed Protection Program [79075. - 79088.]

79075.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Watershed Protection Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Watershed Protection Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79076.

The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79077.

The purposes of this article are to provide funds to assist in implementing watershed plans to reduce flooding, control erosion, improve water quality, and improve aquatic and terrestrial species habitats, to restore natural systems of groundwater recharge, native vegetation, water flows, and riparian zones, to restore the beneficial uses of waters of the state in watersheds, and to provide matching funds for federal grant programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79078.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Local agency” means any city, county, city and county, district, or other political subdivision of the state.

(b) “Local watershed group” means a group consisting of owners and managers of land within the watershed of interest, local, state, and federal
 government representatives, and interested persons, other than landowners, who reside or work within the watershed of interest, and may include other persons, organizations, nonprofit corporations, and businesses.

(c) “Local watershed management plan” means a document prepared by a local watershed group that sets forth a strategy to achieve an ecologically stable watershed, and that does all of the following:

(1) Defines the geographical boundaries of the watershed.

(2) Describes the natural resource conditions within the watershed.

(3) Describes measurable characteristics for water quality improvements.

(4) Describes methods for achieving and sustaining water quality improvements.

(5) Identifies any person, organization, or public agency that is responsible for implementing the methods described in paragraph (4).

(6) Provides milestones for implementing the methods described in paragraph (4).

(7) Describes a monitoring program designed to measure the effectiveness of the methods described in paragraph (4).

(d) “Municipality” has the same meaning as defined in the Clean Water Act and also includes the state or any agency, department, or political subdivision thereof, and applicants eligible for technical assistance under Section 319 (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1329) or grants under Section 320 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1330).

(e) “Nonprofit organization” means any
 California corporation organized under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) “Regional board” means a regional water quality control board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79079.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, may be used by the board for grants to municipalities, local agencies, or nonprofit organizations in accordance with this article. The grants shall be used to develop local watershed management plans or to implement projects that are consistent with local watershed management and regional water quality control plans. The board shall ensure that activities funded by these grants will be coordinated with activities
 undertaken by state and federal agencies, and with other appropriate watershed efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79079.5.

The funds used for the purposes described in Section 79079 shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Sixty percent to projects in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Diego, San Bernardino, and Ventura.

(b) Forty percent to projects in counties not described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79080.

(a) A municipality, local agency, or nonprofit organization may only receive a grant under this article if the board determines that both of the following apply:

(1) The municipality, local agency, or nonprofit organization has adequate legal authority to manage the grant money.

(2) The municipality, local agency, or nonprofit organization is a
 member of a local watershed group.

(b) Grants may be awarded for projects that implement methods for attaining watershed improvements or for a monitoring program described in a local watershed management plan in an amount not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project. At least 85 percent of the total amount in the subaccount shall be used for capital outlay projects described in this subdivision.

(c) Eligible projects under this article may do any of the following:

(1) Reduce chronic flooding problems or control water velocity and volume using vegetation management or other nonstructural methods.

(2) Protect and enhance greenbelts and riparian and wetlands habitats.

(3) Restore or improve habitat for aquatic or terrestrial species.

(4) Monitor the water quality conditions and assess the environmental health of the watershed.

(5) Use geographic information systems to display and manage the environmental data describing the watershed.

(6) Prevent watershed soil erosion and sedimentation of surface waters.

(7) Support beneficial groundwater recharge capabilities.

(8) Otherwise reduce the discharge of pollutants to state waters from storm water or nonpoint sources.

(d) (1) Grants may be awarded to municipalities, local agencies, or nonprofit organizations
 for the development of local watershed management plans in amounts not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per local watershed management plan.

(2) Funding under this subdivision may be used to develop components of local watershed management plans that contribute to the development or implementation of species recovery plans.

(e) Grants may be awarded to meet requirements for nonfederal matching funds set forth in Section 205(j) of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1285(j)) or Section 319(h) of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1329(h)).

(f) Projects funded under this article shall be designed to withstand substantial flooding and shall include a minimum 10-year maintenance program and shall demonstrate the potential to provide watershed benefits for 20 years.

(g) A proponent of a project funded from the subaccount, except a grant recipient pursuant to subdivision (d), shall be required to submit to the board a monitoring and reporting plan that does all of the following:

(1) Describes the baseline water quality of the waterbody impacted.

(2) Describes the manner in which the proposed watershed restoration activities are implemented.

(3) Determines the effectiveness of the watershed restoration activities in preventing or reducing pollution.

(4) Determines, to the extent feasible, the changes in the pattern of flow in affected streams, including reduction of flood flows and increases in spring, summer, and fall flows that result from the
 implementation of the project.

(5) Determines, to the extent feasible, the economic benefits resulting from changes determined pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4).

(h) (1) A grant applicant shall inform the board with regard to necessary public agency approvals, entitlements, and permits that may be necessary to implement the project. The municipality, local agency, or nonprofit organization shall certify to the board, at the appropriate time, that those approvals, entitlements, and permits have been granted.

(2) A grant applicant shall notify, in writing, adjoining landowners of its request for funding under this article and the scope of the project for which the funding is requested. If this paragraph requires notification of more than 200 landowners, notification may be made by letter to the
 owners of record of the 200 largest parcels and by publication for at least 20 days in a local newspaper of general circulation. Upon completion of the notification required under this paragraph, the municipality, local agency, or nonprofit organization shall inform the board that the notification has occurred.

(i) The board may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(j) In awarding grants under this article, the board shall consider the extent to which projects do the following:

(1) Consider the entire ecosystem to be protected or restored.

(2) Include definable targets and desired future conditions.

(3) Support local community institutional capacity to restore the watershed.

(4) Include community decisionmaking by affected stakeholders in project design and fund allocation.

(5) Help protect intact or nearly intact ecosystems and watersheds.

(6) Consider the economic benefits of the restoration project or program.

(7) Address the root causes of degradation, rather than the symptoms.

(8) Maximize the use of other restoration funds.

(9) Include an educational component, if appropriate.

(10) Improve the quality of drinking water and support other beneficial uses of waters of the state, including coastal waters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79081.

A grant recipient shall obtain written permission from the landowners of the parcel of land upon which the project is proposed to be carried out. The written permission shall expressly consent to the actions described in the grant application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79082.

Not more than 25 percent of a grant may be awarded in advance of actual expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79083.

A grant recipient shall submit to the board a report upon the completion of the project or activity funded under this article. The report shall summarize the completed project and identify additional steps necessary to achieve the purposes of the local watershed management plan. The board shall make the report available to interested federal, state, and local agencies and other interested parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 185.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79084.

(a) Of the funds transferred pursuant to Section 79076, at least thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) shall be for grants to small communities.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “small community” means a municipality with a population of 10,000 persons or less, a rural county, or a reasonably isolated and divisible segment of a larger municipality where the population of the segment is 10,000 persons or
 less, with a financial hardship as determined by the board.

(c) If the board determines that any of the funds made available for grants under this section will not be encumbered for that purpose on or before January 1, 2007, the board may use these funds for other purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79085.

The board shall give added consideration to projects that utilize the services of the California Conservation Corps, community conservation corps, or other local nonprofit entities employing underprivileged youths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79085.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the following amounts from the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be allocated as follows:

(a) The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the board for allocation to the Pajaro River Watershed Flood Prevention Authority for a hydrologic study with regard to the Pajaro River Watershed.

(b) The sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) to the board for allocation to the County of Sonoma to develop and implement community-based watershed management activities that will protect, restore, and enhance the environmental and economic value of the Russian River Watershed in the County of Sonoma.

(c) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the board for the Clover Creek Flood Protection and Environmental Enhancement Project to provide for the acquisition, restoration, and conservation of low-flow stream channel, open water, seasonal wetlands, riparian habitat, oak woodland regeneration, and grassland meadow preservation.

(d) The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the board to rehabilitate and improve the Clear Lake Watershed by funding one or more of the following projects or activities: Clear Lake Basin 2000 Project, aeration, wetlands
 restoration, fishery enhancement, and wastewater treatment, or for grants awarded by the board to local public agencies for any of these purposes. The first priority for funding under this subdivision is for a grant award to fund eligible expenses of the Basin 2000 Project.

(e) To the maximum extent feasible, the watershed restoration and flood control projects described in this subdivision shall do one or more of the following:

(1) Preserve agricultural land.

(2) Protect and enhance wildlife habitat.

(3) Protect and enhance recreational and environmental education resources.

(4) Protect lake water quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79086.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall terminate any grant where it is determined that the project is not providing the proposed watershed benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79087.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79088.

Where recovery plans for coho salmon, steelhead trout, or other threatened or endangered aquatic species exist, projects funded under this article shall be consistent with those plans, and to the extent feasible, shall seek to implement actions specified in those plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Water and Watershed Education Program [79090. - 79094.]

79090.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Water and Watershed Education Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Water and Watershed Education Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79091.

The sum of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79092.

Three million dollars ($3,000,000) in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, may be used by the department for allocation to California State University, Fresno for the purposes of establishing and furthering the purposes of the California Water Institute at that campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 13.   Effective October 9, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79093.

Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, shall be used by the department for the development of a Delta Science Center, including, but not limited to, all of the following components:

(a) Public educational opportunities.

(b) Wildlife and habitat enhancement.

(c) Preservation of agricultural lands.

(d) Enhanced levee protection and rehabilitation.

(e) Water quality improvements.

(f) Nonstructural flood protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79094.

Three million dollars ($3,000,000) in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the University of California, may be used for the purpose of site acquisition, construction, and equipping of a Watershed Science Laboratory, for long-term monitoring and research with regard to the hydrology, geomorphology, water quality and aquatic and riparian ecology of the north delta and its tributary watersheds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. River Protection Program [79100. - 79104.]

79100.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the River Protection Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the River Protection Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79101.

The sum of ninety-five million dollars ($95,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79102.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may be used to meet the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 78682) of Chapter 6 of Division 24.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79103.

At least 60 percent of the funds transferred pursuant to Section 79101 shall be used for projects that are located in, or in close proximity to, major metropolitan areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79103.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, of the funds transferred pursuant to Section 79101, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall, upon appropriation to the department, be allocated to the San Joaquin River Parkway Conservancy for the purposes of the San Joaquin River Parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79103.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, of the funds transferred pursuant to Section 79101, two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in the subaccount shall be used by the department, upon appropriation, for the purpose of the Kern River Parkway Project between the mouth of Kern Canyon and Interstate Highway Route 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Southern California Integrated Watershed Program [79104.20. - 79104.34.]

79104.20.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Santa Ana Watershed is experiencing increased water demands due to significant population growth that has caused undue infrastructure dependence and strain on imported water supplies.

(b) Regional programs have been developed to address the problems facing the watershed. These programs have four
 main elements, as follows:

(1) Storage of more than one million acre-feet of water from wet years in groundwater storage basins.

(2) Conservation, including water use efficiency and reclamation, that results in the substantial development of new usable supplies.

(3) Desalting and treatment of brackish water to allow poor quality water to be reclaimed and used.

(4) Enhancement of native habitat along the river and its tributaries.

(c) The water supply programs proposed by the Santa Ana Watershed Project Authority will develop significant new water supply and storage capabilities, thereby reducing the imported water needs of urban southern California, especially during dry
 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.22.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Santa Ana River Watershed Subaccount.

(b) For purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Santa Ana River Watershed Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.24.

The sum of two hundred thirty-five million dollars ($235,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.26.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, may be used by the board for allocation to the Santa Ana Watershed Project Authority for all of the following projects for the purposes of rehabilitating and improving the Santa Ana River Watershed:

(a) Basin water banking in one or more of the following basins: Chino, Colton, Orange County, Riverside, San Bernardino, and San Jacinto.

(b) Contaminant and salt removal through reclamation and desalting in Orange County, San Jacinto, or other basins in the watershed.

(c) Removal of nonnative plants, and the creation of new open space and wetlands.

(d) Programs for water conservation and efficiency and storm water capture and management.

(e) Planning and implementation of a flood control program to protect agricultural operations and adjacent property , to assist in abating the effects of waste discharges into waters of the state, consistent with the requirements of Section 13442.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.30.

It is the intent of the Legislature to urge the federal government to allocate funds for projects to improve the Santa Ana River Watershed to match the state’s financial commitment to the projects described in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.32.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the expenditure of the funds under this article be made through a broad-based watershed stakeholder process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.34.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay costs incurred by the board in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Lake Elsinore and San Jacinto Watershed Program [79104.100. - 79104.114.]

79104.100.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Lake Elsinore and San Jacinto Watershed Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Lake Elsinore and San Jacinto Watershed Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.102.

The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.104.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, may be used by the board to rehabilitate and improve the Lake Elsinore Watershed and San Jacinto Watershed and the water quality of Lake Elsinore by funding one or more of the following projects: watershed monitoring, storm channel modification, nutrient control, aeration, wetlands restoration and enhancement, wildlife habitat enhancement, fishery enhancement, calcium quicklime treatment, and sediment removal, or
 for grants awarded by the board to the Santa Ana Watershed Project Authority, other joint powers authorities, or local public agencies for any of these purposes, and for related planning and administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.106.

To the maximum extent feasible, the watershed management and flood control projects described in Section 79104.104 shall do one or more of the following:

(a) Preserve agricultural land.

(b) Protect wildlife habitat.

(c) Protect and enhance recreational resources.

(d) Improve lake water quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.108.

It is the intent of the Legislature to urge the federal government to allocate funds for projects to improve the Lake Elsinore Watershed and San Jacinto Watershed, and lake water quality by matching the state’s financial commitment to those projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.110.

The funds appropriated pursuant to Section 79104.104 shall be allocated to a joint powers agency consisting of the City of Lake Elsinore, the Santa Ana Watershed Project Authority, the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and other agencies for implementation of programs to improve the water quality and habitat of Lake Elsinore, and its back basin consistent with the Lake Elsinore Management Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.114.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Coastal Watershed Salmon Habitat Program [79104.200. - 79104.206.]

79104.200.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Coastal Watershed Salmon Habitat Subaccount.

(b) For the purpose of this article, “subaccount” means the Coastal Watershed Salmon Habitat Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.202.

The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.204.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the Department of Fish and Game, shall be used by the Department of Fish and Game for direct expenditure and for grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to protect, restore, acquire, and enhance habitat for salmon. These funds may be used to match federal funding available for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79104.206.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Clean Water and Water Recycling Program [79105. - 79149.16.]



  ARTICLE 1. Clean Water and Water Recycling Account [79105. - 79106.]

79105.

For the purposes of this chapter, “account” means the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account created by Section 79106.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79106.

The Clean Water and Water Recycling Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of three hundred fifty-five million dollars ($355,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nonpoint Source Pollution Control Program [79110. - 79117.]

79110.

The purpose of this article is to provide grant funding for projects that protect the beneficial uses of water throughout the state through the control of nonpoint source pollution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79111.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Best management practices” means those practices or set of practices determined by the board, a regional board, or the water quality planning agency for a designated area to be the most effective feasible means of preventing or reducing the generation of a specific type of nonpoint source pollution, given technological,
 institutional, environmental, and economic constraints.

(b) “Capital costs” has the same meaning as “cost,” as defined in Section 32025 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) “Management measures” means economically achievable measures to prevent or control the addition of pollutants to state waters, which reflect the greatest degree of pollutant prevention achievable through the application of the best available nonpoint source pollution control practices, technologies, processes, siting criteria, operating methods, or other alternatives.

(d) “Regional board” means a regional water quality control board.

(e) “Subaccount” means the Nonpoint Source Pollution Control Subaccount created by Section 79112.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79112.

There is hereby created in the account the Nonpoint Source Pollution Control Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79113.

The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79114.

(a) The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, may be used by the board to award grants, not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project, to local public agencies or nonprofit organizations formed by landowners to prepare and implement local nonpoint source plans. Grants shall only be awarded for any of the following projects:

(1) A project that is consistent with
 local watershed management plans that are developed under subdivision (d) of Section 79080 and with regional water quality control plans.

(2) A broad-based nonpoint source project, including a project identified in the board’s “Initiatives in NPS Management,” dated September 1995, and nonpoint source technical advisory committee reports.

(3) A project that is consistent with the “Integrated Plan for Implementation of the Watershed Management Initiative” prepared by the board and the regional boards.

(4) A project that implements management measures and practices or other needed projects identified by the board pursuant to its nonpoint source pollution control program’s 15-year implementation strategy and five-year implementation plan that meets the requirements of Section 6217(g) of the federal Coastal Zone Act
 Reauthorization Amendments of 1990.

(b) The projects funded from the subaccount shall demonstrate a capability of sustaining water quality benefits for a period of 20 years. Categories of nonpoint source pollution addressed by projects may include, but are not limited to: silviculture, agriculture, urban runoff, mining, hydromodification, grazing, onsite disposal systems, boatyards and marinas, and animal feeding operations. Projects to address nonpoint source pollution may include, but are not limited to, wildfire management, installation of vegetative systems to filter or retard pollutant loading, incentive programs or large scale demonstration programs to reduce commercial reliance on polluting substances or to increase acceptance of alternative methods and materials, and engineered features to minimize impacts of nonpoint source pollution. Projects shall have defined water quality or beneficial use goals.

(c) Projects funded from the subaccount shall utilize best management practices, management measures, or both.

(d) If projects include capital costs, those costs shall be identified by the project applicant. The grant recipient shall provide a matching contribution for the portion of the project consisting of capital expenditures for construction, according to the following formula:Project Capital Cost/Capital Cost Match by Recipient$1,000,000 to $5,000,000, inclusive20%$125,000 to $999,999, inclusive15%$1 to $124,999, inclusive10%(e) Not more than 25 percent of a grant may be awarded in advance of actual expenditure.

(f) A proponent of a project funded from the subaccount shall be required to submit to the board a
 monitoring and reporting plan that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies one or more nonpoint sources of pollution.

(2) Describes the baseline water quality of the waterbody impacted.

(3) Describes the manner in which the proposed practices or measures are implemented.

(4) Determines the effectiveness of the proposed practices or measures in preventing or reducing pollution.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the board may award up to 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount for demonstration projects that are intended to prevent, reduce, or treat nonpoint source pollution.

(h) A grant recipient shall
 submit a report to the board, upon completion of the project, that summarizes completed activities and indicates whether the purposes of the project have been met. The report shall include information collected by the grant recipient in accordance with the project monitoring and reporting plan, including a determination of the effectiveness of the best management practices or management measures implemented as part of the project in preventing or reducing nonpoint source pollution. The board shall make the report available to watershed groups, and federal, state, and local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79114.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the subaccount, to the board to be used by the board, after consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, for loans, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per loan, to provide low interest loans to finance the construction of projects designed to manage animal nutrients from animal feeding operations. Grants may be made available to local
 public agencies to pay for the cost of developing ordinances, regulations, and elements for their General Plan or other planning devices to assist in providing uniform standards for the permitting and operation of animal feeding operations within their jurisdictions. These funds may also be used for the preparation of the related environmental reviews that may be necessary under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) for approval of the devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79114.3.

No project shall receive funds under this article if it receives funds pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 79148).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79114.5.

(a) Sixty percent of the money in the subaccount shall be allocated to projects in the Counties of Riverside, Ventura, Los Angeles, San Diego, Orange, or San Bernardino.
